nl: Ondersteuning voor VDI-protocol: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Andere
da: Understøttelse af VDI-protokol: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Andet
sk-SK: Podpora protokolu VDI: Extrémny výbuch; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Iné
zh-CN: VDI 协议支持: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; 其他
lt-LT: VDI protokolo palaikymas: „Blast extreme“; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Kita
sl-SI: Podpora za protokol VDI: Blast extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Drugo
fi: Vdi-protokollan tuki: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Muu
pl: Obsługa protokołu Vdi: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Inne
bg-BG: Поддръжка на VDI протокол: Blast extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Други
hr-HR: Podrška za VDI protokol: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Ostalo
vi: Hỗ trợ giao thức VDI: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Khác
tr: Vdi Protokol Desteği: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Diğer
de: VDI-Protokollunterstützung: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Sonstiges
cs: Podpora protokolu VDI: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Jiné
el: Υποστήριξη πρωτοκόλλου VDI: Ακραία έκρηξη; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Άλλο
pt-PT: Assistência ao protocolo VDI: Explosão extrema; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Outro
pt-BR: Suporte ao protocolo VDI: Blast extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Outro
en: VDI protocol support: Blast extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Other
ro-RO: Acceptare protocol VDI: Blast extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Altele
ru: Поддержка протокола VDI: Blast extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Другое
it: Supporto del protocollo VDI: Blast extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Altro
sv: Stöd för VDI-protokoll: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Övrigt
fr: Prise en charge du protocole VDI: Explosion extrême; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Autre
es: Compatibilidad del protocolo VDI: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Otros
th: รองรับโปรโตคอล Vdi: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 虛擬桌面基礎架構協定支援: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; 其他
ko: VDI 프로토콜 지원: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; 기타
ja: VDIプロトコルに対応: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; その他
hu: VDI protokoll támogatása: Extrém robbanás; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Egyéb
nb: Vdi-protokollstøtte: Blast Extreme; ICA/HDX; PCoIP; RDP; VDI; Annet